Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202626-112
Hearing; admission of petition, affidavit, or military protective order.

During any hearing on a protection order:

(1) The petition and affidavit shall be deemed to have been offered into evidence, and they shall be admitted into evidence unless specifically excluded by the court; and

(2) A military protective order may be admitted as evidence of the respondent's past conduct and the need for a protection order.

Laws 2025, LB80, § 12;

Laws 2026, LB753, § 3.
July 18, 2026